District of Columbia statutes.
41-127

Judicial review of Mayor’s decision.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Mayor, or as to whose claim the Mayor has failed to hold a hearing within a reasonable time pursuant to § 41-125(a), may have such claim reviewed pursuant to § 2-510.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 127, 27 DCR 5150

History

1981 Ed., § 42-227.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 26 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).

Editor's Notes